Utah statutes.
4-32-10.   Judicial review of orders enforcing chapter.

(1)  Any party aggrieved by an order issued under Subsection 4-32-7(3) or under Subsection 4-32-8(1), (2), or (3) may obtain judicial review.

(2)  The district courts have jurisdiction to enforce this chapter, and to prevent and restrain violations of this chapter, and have jurisdiction in all other kinds of cases arising under this chapter.

(3)  All proceedings for the enforcement of this chapter, or to restrain violations of this chapter, shall be by and in the name of this state.

